Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.030

Park and recreation board—Composition.

Each county may form a county park and recreation board composed of seven members, who shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners to serve without compensation.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 93; 1963 c 4 s 36.68.030. Prior: 1949 c 94 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3991-16.]